Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.087

Class I and class II milk defined.

For the purpose of RCW 15.44.085, class I and class II milk sold means milk from cows produced by a producer as defined in RCW 15.44.010 and utilized as follows:

(1) Class I milk shall be all skim milk and butterfat:

(a) Sold in the form of fluid milk product subject to the following limitations and exceptions:

(i) Any products fortified with added nonfat milk solids shall be class I in an amount equal only to the weight of an equal volume of like unmodified product of the same butterfat content.

(ii) Fluid milk products in concentrated form shall be class I in an amount equal to the skim milk and butterfat used to produce the quantity of such products sold.

(iii) Products classified as class II pursuant to subsection (2) of this section are excepted.

(b) Packaged fluid milk products in inventory at the end of the month.

(2) Class II milk shall be all skim milk and butterfat:

(a) Used to produce ice cream, ice cream mix, frozen desserts, aerated cream products, plastic cream, soured cream dressing, yogurt, eggnog, cottage cheese, pot cheese, bakers cheese, cream cheese, neufchatel cheese, or starter; or

(b) Any milk or milk product, sterilized and either (i) packaged in hermetically sealed metal, plastic, foil, paper, or glass containers and used to produce condensed milk and condensed skim milk, or (ii) in fluid milk products disposed of in bulk to commercial food processing establishments or producer milk sold to a commercial food processing establishment.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 136 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 238: See note following RCW 15.44.010.